Utah statutes.
76-8-304.   Disturbing Legislature or official meeting.

(1)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if he intentionally:

(a)  disturbs the Legislature, or either of the houses composing it, while in session;

(b)  commits any disorderly conduct in the immediate view and presence of either house of the Legislature, tending to interrupt its proceedings or impair the respect of its authority; or

(c)  disturbs an official meeting or commits any disorderly conduct in immediate view and presence of participants in an official meeting tending to interrupt its proceedings.

(2)  "Official meeting," as used in this section, means any lawful meeting of public servants for the purposes of carrying on governmental functions.

